New Jersey, session 221, A1225.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.  a.  Within two years after the effective date of P.L.    , c.    (C.        ) (pending before the Legislature as this bill), the State Agriculture Development Committee shall survey and identify, for each county, all farmland that satisfies the eligibility criteria for differential property taxation pursuant to the Farmland Assessment Act of 1964, P.L.1964, c.48 (C.54:4-23.1 et seq.), in the county that does not meet the minimum acreage requirement for eligibility for farmland preservation as established by the county in which the farmland is located. b.  Upon completion of the survey, the committee shall: (1) notify the owner of the farmland identified in the survey, in writing, of the minimum eligibility criteria for preserving land for farmland preservation purposes, other than income requirements, established by the committee pursuant to N.J.A.C.2:76-6.20; and (2) invite the owner of the farmland to apply to the committee to preserve the land for farmland preservation purposes through the sale of a development easement or fee simple title pursuant to the Agricultural Retention and Development Act, P.L.1983, c.32 (C.4:1C-11 et seq.), the Garden State Preservation Trust Act, P.L.1999, c.152 (C.13:8C-1 et seq.), or the Preserve New Jersey Act, P.L.2016, c.12 (C.13:8C-43 et seq.). c.  For the purposes of this section and the owners application, if the income requirements to qualify for differential property taxation pursuant to the Farmland Assessment Act of 1964, P.L.1964, c.48 (C.54:4-23.1 et seq.), are satisfied by the farm, the committee shall not apply any income requirements established pursuant to N.J.A.C.2:76-6.20 to the application. d.  The committee may complete the survey and identification process for each county in the order it determines appropriate, provided that all farmland in a county is identified and all owners of the farmland have been notified pursuant to this section before the committee initiates a survey in a subsequent county. e.  The committee shall approve applications for the preservation of farmland submitted pursuant to this section in the order they are submitted consistent with the priority system established by the committee for the preservation of farmland, to the extent that funding is available and the farm meets eligibility criteria for farmland preservation purposes. f.  No later than one year after the date upon which the committee has completed the survey for each county in the State, the committee shall report to the Governor, and, pursuant to section 2 of P.L.1991, c.164 (C.52:14-19.1), to the Legislature: (1)  the number of properties in each county, that are eligible for differential property taxation pursuant to the Farmland Assessment Act of 1964, P.L.1964, c.48 (C.54:4-23.1 et seq.),in the county that do not meet the minimum standard for farmland preservation set by the county in which the farm is located; and (2)  the number of applications for farmland preservation received for farmland identified in the survey and the status of each application. g.  As used in this section, farmland, farmland preservation, and farmland preservation purposes mean the same as the terms are defined in section 3 of P.L.1999, c.152 (C.13:8C-3). 2.  This act shall take effect immediately.